Utah statutes.
48-1d-805.   Continued use of partnership name.

Continued use of a partnership name, or name of a person dissociated as a partner as part of the partnership name, by partners continuing the business does not of itself make the person dissociated as a partner liable for an obligation of the partners or the partnership continuing the business.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

